New York, session 2025-2026, S8812.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the 2 public service law relating to the provision of gas service to new 3 customers, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8417 and A. 8888, 4 is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately] one year after it shall 6 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 7 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 8 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 9 completed on or before such effective date. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13315-04-6